Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,262
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Best practices in environmental safety and protection recognize that the regulation of water supply and disposal infrastructure are connected;

(2) The proper design, construction, and monitoring of water and wastewater uses is critical for the safety and sustainability of communities in the State of Nebraska;

(3) The regulation of mobile homes, recreation camps, and swimming pools provide fundamental environmental safety for persons who use them; and

(4) Consolidating the administration of state environmental safety programs and the environmental and water programs of the United States Environmental Protection Agency delegated to the State of Nebraska into the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment will better serve the communities in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2021, LB148, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 442.